Utah statutes.
4-19-3.   Loans -- Not to exceed period of 10 years -- Agricultural Advisory Board to approve loans and renewals, methods of payments, and interest rates -- Guidelines in fixing interest rates declared.

(1)  The department may not make a loan authorized under this chapter for a period to exceed 10 years but the loan is renewable.

(2)  The Agricultural Advisory Board shall approve:

(a)  all loans and renewals;

(b)  the methods of repayment; and

(c)  the interest rates charged.

(3)  In fixing interest rates, the Agricultural Advisory Board shall consider:

(a)  the current applicable interest rate or rates being charged by the USDA Farm Service Agency on similar loans;

(b)  the current prime rate charged by leading lending institutions; and

(c)  any other pertinent economic data.

(4)  The interest rates established shall be compatible with guidelines stated in this section.

